Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.080

Waiver of notification and marking requirements.

The notification and marking provisions of this chapter may be waived for one or more designated persons by a facility operator with respect to all or part of that facility operator's underground facilities.

[ 2011 c 263 s 15; 1984 c 144 s 8.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.